Washington statutes.
RCW 36.94.470

Storm or surface water drains or facilities—Annexation, incorporation of area by city or town—Imposition of rates and charges by county.

Whenever a city or town annexes an area, or a city or town incorporates an area, and the county has issued revenue bonds or general obligation bonds to finance storm or surface water drains or facilities that are payable in whole or in part from rates or charges imposed in the area, the county shall continue imposing all portions of the rates or charges that are allocated to payment of the debt service on bonds in that area after the effective date of the annexation or official date of the incorporation until: (1) The debt is retired; (2) any debt that is issued to refinance the underlying debt is retired; or (3) the city or town reimburses the county amount that is sufficient to retire that portion of the debt borne by the annexed or incorporated area. The county shall construct all facilities included in the stormwater plan intended to be financed by the proceeds of such bonds. If the county provides stormwater management services to the city or town by contract, the contract shall consider the value of payments made by property owners to the county for the payment of debt service.

The provisions of this section apply whether or not the bonds finance facilities that are geographically located within the area that is annexed or incorporated.

[ 1993 c 361 s 2.]